District of Columbia statutes.
7-1231.15

Enforcement.

Rights and protections provided in this chapter shall not be construed to create new causes of action for monetary damages beyond those that currently exist in federal and local law.

History

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 215, 48 DCR 7674

Cross References

Health-care assistance reimbursement, set-off, see § 4-603.
Nursing homes and community residence facilities protections, receivers, powers and duties, see § 44-1002.06.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 215 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).